hu_hu.dict
ügyel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
ötletel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
összegez/¨Ś¤˘EeŹd'X	
ölel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
öklelődzik/Ş¨Ś¤˘P­X
ízel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
érvénytelenít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
érvényesül/Ş¨Ś¤˘P­X
épül/Ş¨Ś¤˘P­X
éledezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
édesül/Ş¨Ś¤˘P­X
ásítozik/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX
állatiasodik/ŠŁOŤX
állapodik/ŠŁOŤX
ágyúz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
zökkent/Ş¨Ś¤EeŹX	
zárthelyizik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
zihál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
zanzásít/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
zabláz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
vélelmez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
végrendelkezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
von/ŠĽŁOoŤX	
vitorlázik/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX
villózik/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX
veszt/ŞŚ¤EeŹX	
verejtékezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
vastagodik/ŠŁOŤX	
vakációzik/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX
vacillál/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX
türtőztet/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
törvényesül/Ş¨Ś¤˘P­X
tönkrejuttat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
tömörül/Ş¨Ś¤˘P­X
ténylegesít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
táviratoz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
tángál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
tréfálkozik/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX
trécsel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
traktál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
továbbít/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
tintázik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
teremtet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX)
teniszezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
temperál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
tataroz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
tajtékoz/§ĽŁĄXOŤd)	
tajtékoz/§ĽŁĄXOŤd	
sürgölődik/Ş¤P­X
söröz/Ş¨Ś¤˘P­X
sítalpazik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
szűkít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
szőkül/Ş¨Ś¤˘P­X
szélesbít/ŞŚ¤˘EŹXe
szántat/ŠĽŁOoŤX
számlál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
szájal/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
szlovákosodik/ŠŁOŤX
szivarozik/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX
szikkaszt/Š§ĽŁOoŤX	
szeszez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
szeppen/Ş¤EŹX
szelídül/Ş¨Ś¤˘P­X
szel/ŞŚ¤EeŹX	
szaporáz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
szakosodik/ŠŁOŤX
suvasztat/ŠĽŁOoŤX
stoppol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
spékel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
sorvasztat/ŠĽŁOoŤX)
skandál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
sipákol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
serkentet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX
sajnálkozik/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX
rügyezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
röhögcsél/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
rágicsál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
ruház/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
romol/§ĽŁĄXOŤd)	
rokizik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
rikoltozik/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX
riadozik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
rezdít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
rejlik/ŞEŹX
regisztrál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
reggelizik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
raplizik/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX
radikalizálódik/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
pöccen/Ş¤EŹX
pusztít/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
puskáz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
présel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
proponál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
precizíroz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
poroz/§ĽŁĄXOoŤd'	
plakátoz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
piál/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX
persziflál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
peresít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
perecel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
passzivál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
parancsol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
osztozik/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX
ostoroz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
olcsóbbodik/ŠŁOŤX
németesít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
nyújtat/ŠĽŁOoŤX
nyugoszt/Š§ĽŁOoŤX
nyirbál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
nyeldekel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
nosztrifikál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
nemzet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX
műtrágyáz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
mélyül/Ş¨Ś¤˘P­X
mámorosít/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
mágnesez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
motozgat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
monologizál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
menedzsel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
mellékel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
megbízat/ŠĽŁOoŤX
mardos/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
marasztal/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
létrehívat/ŠĽŁOoŤX
légiesül/Ş¨Ś¤˘P­X
légfürdőzik/Ş¨Ś¤˘Pp­X
lyukaszt/Š§ĽŁOoŤX	
lustálkodik/ŠŁOŤX
lelkendez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
lejtősít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
legózik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
lassúzik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
lapozgat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
kövérít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
köveszt/Ş¨Ś¤EeŹX	
költöztet/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
kótyavetyél/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
kérlel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
kényesül/Ş¨Ś¤˘P­X
kávézik/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX
károsul/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX
kábszerezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
kvarcol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
krakkol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
kozmetikáz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
kosártalanít/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
koordinál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
konszolidál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
konferenciázik/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX
kommunistázik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
kisdolgozik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
kettőzik/Ş¨Ś¤˘P­X
kerül/Ş¨Ś¤˘Pp­X
kerékpározik/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX
kemizál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
kegyetlenkedik/Ş¤EŹX
kegyelmez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
kanalaz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
kamerázik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
kalibrál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
jajveszékel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
izolál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
ivartalanít/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
iszamodik/ŠŁOŤX
ismertet/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
indítózik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
iktatódik/ŠŁOŤX
igazolódik/ŠŁOŤX
hülyül/Ş¨Ś¤˘P­X
hörpent/Ş¨Ś¤EeŹX	
háramol/§ĽŁĄOŤdX	
hunyászkodik/ŠŁOŤX
humorizál/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX
himbálódzik/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX
heverészik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
hengerel/¨Ś¤˘EeŹd'X	
hazudtol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
hazaárulózik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤXy
hantáz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
hangversenyez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
halandzsáz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
halad/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	
gúnyol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
gyüszmékel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
gyűlik/Ş¤P­X
gyertyáz/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX
gyarapul/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
gondnokol/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX
gennyezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
gajdol/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX
füvészkedik/Ş¤EŹX
fúvat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
fésül/Ş¨Ś¤˘Pp­X
fényez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
fájlal/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
forszíroz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
forral/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
fonnyaszt/Š§ĽŁOoŤX	
firkantat/ŠĽŁOoŤX)
finomkodik/ŠŁOŤX
feslődik/Ş¤P­X
felel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
fejleszt/Ş¨Ś¤EeŹX	
exkommunikál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
esztergályoz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
esedez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
erőszakol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
erősbödik/Ş¤P­X
emelget/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
eltel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹ
egyesít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
dörzsöl/Ş¨Ś¤˘Pp­X
dudorodik/ŠŁOŤX
dotál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
differenciál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
deportál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
demilitarizál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
címkéz/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
csügged/Ş¤EŹX	
csírázik/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX
csámpázik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
csáklyáz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
csingilingizik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
cseppfolyósít/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
csendesedik/Ş¤EŹX
csekélyell/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX	
csattantat/ŠĽŁOoŤX
búg/ŠŁOŤX
böjtöl/Ş¨Ś¤˘Pp­X
bírál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
bélistáz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
boázik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
borzolódik/ŠŁOŤX
bizonyosodik/ŠŁOŤX
biliárdoz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
betyárkodik/ŠŁOŤX
beszél/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
belez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
asszociál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
appercipiál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
allelujázik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
alakítgat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
akarózik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
